en: Nail conditioning
cs: Nehtový kondicionér
da: Neglepleje
de: Nagelpflege
el: Περιποίηση νυχιών
es: Acondicionador de uñas
et: Küünepalsam
fi: Kynsiä hoitava aine
fr: Entretien des ongles
hu: Körömkondicionáló anyag, adalékanyag
it: Condizionante per unghie
lt: Nagų kondicionavimo medžiaga
lv: Nagus kondicionējoša viela
nl: Nagelconditioner
pl: Odżywiająca paznokcie
pt: Condicionador de unhas
sk: Látka na zlepšenie kondície nechtov
sl: Sredstvo za nego nohtov
sv: Nagelkonditionerande

en: Opacifying
el: Προωθητικα
es: Opacificante
fi: Ihokarvoja poistava aine
fr: Opacifiant
lt: Drumstiklis
nl: Keratolyse
pl: Środek zmętniający
pt: Opacificante
sk: Kaliaca látka
sl: Sredstvo za motnjenje

en: Oral care
el: Ρυθμιστεσ ιξωδουσ
es: Cuidado oral
fr: Hygiène buccale
lt: Burnos priežiūros medžiaga
nl: Maskeermiddel
pl: Pielęgnacji jamy ustnej
pt: Cuidado bucal
sk: Látka na ústnu hygienu
sl: Sredstvo za nego ustne votline

en: Oxidising
cs: Oxidační přísada
da: Oxiderende
de: Oxidierend
el: Οξειδωτικό
es: Oxidante
et: Oksüdeerija
fr: Agent d'oxydation
hu: Oxidáló szer
it: Ossidante
lt: Oksidatorius
lv: Oksidējoša viela
nl: Oxidatiemiddel
pl: Srodek utleniający
pt: Oxidante
sk: Oxidačná látka
sl: Oksidant
sv: Oxiderande

en: Pearlescent
el: Σταθεροποιητεσ γαλακτωματων
es: Nacarante
et: Stabilisaator
fi: Keratolyytti
fr: Agent nacrant
lt: Perlamutrinis blizgiklis
pl: Perłująca
pt: Perolizante
sk: Perleťotvorná látka
sl: Sredstvo za biserni učinek

en: Plasticiser
el: Προκαλούν σύσπαση του δέρματος.
es: Plastificante
et: Suuhooldusaine
fr: Plastifiant
lt: Plastifikatorius
nl: Ontklitten
pl: Plastyfikator
pt: Plastificante
sk: Zmäkčovadlo
sl: Mehčalo

en: Preservative
cs: Konzervační přísada
da: Konserveringsmiddel
de: Konservierungsstoff
el: Συντηρητικό
es: Conservantes
et: Säilitusaine
fi: Säilöntäaine
fr: Conservateur
hu: Tricontanyl pvp
it: Conservante
lt: Konservantas
lv: Konservants
nl: Conserveermiddel
pl: Konserwująca
pt: Conservante
sk: Konzervačná látka
sl: Konzervans
sv: Konserverande

en: Propellant
cs: Hnací plyn
da: Drivmiddel
de: Treibmittel
el: Προωθητικό
es: Propelente
et: Propellent
fi: Ponneaine
fr: Propulseur
hu: Hajtógáz
it: Propellente
lt: Propelentas
lv: Propelents
nl: Drijfgas
pl: Propelent
pt: Propulsor
sk: Hnacia látka
sl: Potisni plin
sv: Drivmedel

en: Reducing
cs: Redukční přísada
da: Reducerende
de: Reduzierend
el: Αναγωγικό
es: Reductores
et: Redutseerija
fi: Pelkistävä aine
fr: Agent de réduction
hu: Redukáló anyag
it: Riducente
lt: Reduktorius
lv: Reducējoša viela
nl: Reductiemiddel
pl: Redukująca
pt: Redutor
sk: Redukujúca látka
sl: Reducent
sv: Reducerande

en: Refatting
cs: Promašťující přísada
da: Fedtberigende — genfedtning
de: Rückfettend
el: Αναπλήρωση λιπιδίων
es: Reengrasante
et: Rasutaasteaine
fi: Rasvatasapainoa ylläpitävä aine
fr: Agent de restauration lipidique
hu: Zsírpótló anyag
it: Seborestitutivo
lt: Riebalinio sluoksnio atkūrimo medžiaga
lv: Ietaukojoša viela
nl: Vetinbrenger
pl: Natłuszczająca
pt: Relipidante
sk: Výživná látka
sl: Hranilna sestavina kozmetičnih izdelkov
sv: Återfettande

en: Refreshing
de: Perlglanzgebend
es: Refrescante
fi: Auttaa estämään jauhemaisen kosmetiikan paakkuuntumista. pehmentävä aine pehmentää ihoa. pehmitin
fr: Agent raffraîchissant
lt: Vėsiklis
lv: Putas veidojoša viela
pl: Odświeżająca
pt: Refrescante
sk: Osviežujúca látka
sl: Osvežilno sredstvo

en: Skin conditioning
da: Giver kosmetiske produkter et perlemorsagtigt udseende.
de: Stabilisiert den ph-wert von kosmetischen mitteln.
es: Acondicionador de la piel
fr: Entretien de la peau
it: Depilante
lt: Odos kondicionavimo medžiaga
pl: Odżywiająca skórę
pt: Amaciador de pele
sk: Látka na zlepšenie kondície pokožky
sl: Nega kože
sv: Minskar genomskinligheten hos kosmetika. oxiderande

en: Skin protecting
cs: Přísada k ochraně pokožky
da: Hudbeskyttende
de: Hautschützend
el: Προστατευτικό του δέρματος
es: Protector de la piel
et: Nahka kaitsev aine
fi: Ihoa suojaava aine
fr: Agent de protection de la peau
hu: Bőrvédő anyag
it: Protettivo cutaneo
lt: Odos apsaugos medžiaga
lv: Adu aizsargājoša viela
nl: Huidbeschermer
pl: Chroniąca skórę
pt: Protector de pele
sk: Látka na ochranu pokožky
sl: Zaščitno sredstvo za kožo
sv: Hudskyddande

en: Smoothing
da: Er med til at holde kroppens overflade ren. rusthæmmer forhindrer, at emballagen ruster.
de: Spendet lipide für das haar oder die oberen hautschichten.
es: Alisante
fi: Auttaa suojaamaan hampaita plakin muodostumiselta. ponneaine
fr: Agent lissant
it: Districante
lt: Lyginamoji medžiaga
pl: Wygładzająca
pt: Suavizante
sk: Vyhladzujúca látka
sl: Sredstvo za glajenje kože
sv: Hjälper till att hålla kroppsytan ren.

en: Solvent
es: Disolvente
fr: Solvant
lt: Tirpiklis
pl: Rozpuszczalnik
pt: Solvente
sk: Rozpúšťadlo
sl: Topilo
sv: Skumdämpande

en: Soothing
da: Skummer
de: Schaumverstärkend
es: Calmante
fi: Puskuroiva aine
fr: Agent apaisant
lt: Raminamoji medžiaga
lv: Stabilizējoša viela
nl: Schuimer
pl: Kojąca
pt: Calmante
sk: Upokojujúca látka
sl: Blažilno sredstvo
sv: Skumförbättrande

en: Stabilising
de: Hemmt die schweißbildung.
es: Estabilizante
fi: Auttaa hillitsemään talin muodostusta.
fr: Agent stabilisateur
lt: Stabilizatorius
lv: Šķīdinātājs
nl: Schuimversterker
pl: Stabilizująca
pt: Estabilizante
sk: Stabilizátor
sl: Stabilizator

en: Surfactant
da: Stabiliserende
de: Tensid
es: Tensoactivo
fi: Ruskettava aine
fr: Tensioactif
pl: Środek powierzchniowo czynny
pt: Surfactante
sk: Povrchovo aktívna látka
sl: Površinsko aktivna snov
sv: Stabiliserande

en: Tanning
cs: Opalovací přísada
da: (selv-)bruner
de: Bräunend
el: Παράγοντας μαυρίσματος
es: Bronceador
et: Päevitusaine
fr: Agent de bronzage
hu: Cserzőanyag, biológiai hatóanyag
it: Abbronzante
lt: Savaiminio įdegio medžiaga
lv: Iedeguma viela
pl: Opalająca
pt: Bronzeador
sk: Opaľovacia látka
sl: Sredstvo za porjavitev
sv: Brun utan/med sol

en: Tonic
da: Udjævning
de: Trübend
es: Tónico
fi: Silottava aine
fr: Tonifiant
lt: Tonikas
pl: Tonizująca
pt: Tónico
sk: Tonizujúca látka
sl: Krepilno sredstvo
sv: Gör huden mjuk och slät.